Utah statutes.
4-15-4.   Unlawful to offer nursery stock for sale or to solicit orders for nursery stock without license.

It is unlawful for any person in this state to offer nursery stock for sale at a nursery or nursery outlet, or to solicit or receive orders for nursery stock for a person who regularly engages in the business of operating a nursery or nursery outlet, without a license issued by the department.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

